Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB302.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6106(d), (e) and (f) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6106. Commencement of proceedings.* * *(d) Surcharge on order.--When a protection order is granted under section 6107(a), other than pursuant to an agreement of the parties, a surcharge of $100 shall be assessed against the defendant. All moneys received from surcharges shall be distributed in the following order of priority:(1) $25 shall be forwarded to the Commonwealth and shall be appropriated to the Pennsylvania State Police to establish and maintain the Statewide registry of protection orders provided for in section 6105 (relating to responsibilities of 123456789101112131415161718 law enforcement agencies).(1.1) $25 shall be distributed as follows:(i) If an appropriate law enforcement agency serves the defendant with the order, $25 shall be forwarded to the appropriate law enforcement agency who serves the defendant with the order. (ii) If the sheriff serves the defendant with the order, $25 shall be retained by the county and shall be used by the sheriff to carry out the provisions of this chapter.(1.1) $25 SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE SHERIFF, WHO SHALL:(I) FORWARD THE AMOUNT TO THE ENTITY THAT PERFORMED SERVICE OF THE PETITION AND ORDER UNDER SUBSECTION (F); OR(II) RETAIN THE AMOUNT IF THE SHERIFF PERFORMED SERVICE OF THE PETITION AND ORDER UNDER SUBSECTION (F).(2) [$50] $25 shall be retained by the county and shall be used by the court to carry out the provisions of this chapter [as follows:(i) $25 shall be used by the sheriff.(ii) $25 shall be used by the court].(3) $25 shall be forwarded to the Department of [Public Welfare] Human Services for use for victims of domestic violence in accordance with the provisions of section 2333 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.* * *[(e) Court to adopt means of service.--The court shall adopt a means of prompt and effective service in those instances where 20250SB0302PN0762 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the plaintiff avers that service cannot be safely effected by an adult individual other than a law enforcement officer or where the court so orders.](f) Service [by sheriff].--[If the court so orders, the sheriff or other designated agency or individual shall serve the petition and order.] The court shall adopt a means of prompt and effective service and order that the sheriff or appropriate law enforcement agency serve the petition and order.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0302PN0762 - 3 - 12345678910